pt-BR: Característica do porta-copos: Absorvente; Base antiderrapante; Base de cortiça; Adequado para lava-louças; Descartável; Ecológico; Resistente ao calor; Superfície antiaderente; Reutilizável; Reversível; Resistente a riscos; Empilhável; À prova d'água; Outro
vi: Đặc điểm của miếng lót ly: Thấm hút tốt; Đế chống trượt; Mặt sau bằng bần; An toàn cho máy rửa bát; Dùng một lần; Thân thiện với môi trường; Chịu nhiệt; Bề mặt chống dính; Có thể tái sử dụng; Có thể đảo ngược; Khả năng chống xước; Có thể xếp chồng; Chống thấm nước; Khác
lt-LT: Padėkliuko savybės: Susigeriantis; Neslystantis pagrindas; Kamštinis pagrindas; Plaunamas indaplovėje; Vienkartinis; Ekologiškas; Atsparus karščiui; Nelimpantis paviršius; Daugkartinis; Dvipusis; Atsparus įbrėžimams; Komplektuojamas; Atsparus vandeniui; Kita
th: คุณลักษณะของแผ่นรองแก้ว: ซึมซับได้; ฐานกันลื่น; แผ่นรองไม้ก๊อก; ล้างในเครื่องล้างจานได้; ใช้แล้วทิ้ง; เป็นมิตรต่อสิ่งแวดล้อม; ทนต่อความร้อน; ผิวไม่เกาะติด; ใช้ซ้ำได้; ใช้ได้สองด้าน; ทนต่อรอยขีดข่วน; วางซ้อนกันได้; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale suportului de pahare: Absorbant; Bază antiderapantă; Spate de plută; Se poate spăla în mașina de spălat vase; De unică folosință; Ecologic; Rezistent la căldură; Suprafață antiaderentă; Reutilizabil; Reversibil; Rezistent la zgârieturi; Superpozabil; Impermeabil; Altele
nl: Kenmerken onderzetter: Absorberend; Antislipbasis; Kurken onderkant; Vaatwasserbestendig; Wegwerpbaar; Milieuvriendelijk; Hittebestendig; Antikleef oppervlak; Herbruikbaar; Omkeerbaar; Krasbestendig; Stapelbaar; Waterdicht; Overig
zh-TW: 杯墊功能: 易吸收液體; 防滑底座; 軟木背襯; 可用洗碗機清洗; 免洗; 環保; 耐熱; 不沾黏表面; 可重複使用; 雙面; 耐刮; 可堆疊; 防水; 其他
ja: コースターの機能: 吸収性; 滑り止めベース; 裏コルク; 食洗機対応; 使い捨て; 環境に優しい; 耐熱性; ノンスティック表面; 再利用可能; リバーシブル; 耐スクラッチ性; 積み重ね可能; 防水; その他
cs: Vlastnosti podložky: Absorpční; Protiskluzová základna; Korková spodní strana; Vhodné pro mytí v myčce; Jednorázové; Ekologicky šetrné; Tepelná odolnost; Nepřilnavý povrch; Opakovaně použitelné; Oboustranné; Odolné proti poškrábání; Stohovatelné; Voděodolné; Jiné
tr: Bardak altlığı özellikleri: Emici; Kaydırmaz taban; Mantar taban; Bulaşık makinesinde yıkanabilir; Tek kullanımlık; Çevre dostu; Isıya dayanıklı; Yapışmaz yüzey; Yeniden kullanılabilir; Çift taraflı; Çizilmeye dayanıklı; İstiflenebilir; Su geçirmez; Diğer
fi: Lasinalusen ominaisuudet: Imukykyinen; Liukuestepohja; Korkkipohja; Astianpesukoneen kestävä; Kertakäyttöinen; Ympäristöystävällinen; Lämmönkestävä; Tarttumaton pinta; Uudelleen käytettävä; Käännettävä; Naarmuuntumaton; Pinottava; Vedenkestävä; Muu
zh-CN: 杯垫特点: 吸水性; 防滑底座; 软木底; 可用洗碗机清洗; 一次性; 环保; 耐热; 防粘表面; 可重复使用; 可正反用; 耐刮擦; 可叠放; 防水; 其他
ko: 코스터 특징: 흡수제; 미끄럼 방지 베이스; 코르크 백킹; 식기세척기 사용 가능; 일회용; 친환경; 내열성; 논스틱 표면; 재사용 가능; 리버시블; 긁힘 방지; 적층형; 방수; 기타
pt-PT: Características dos suportes para copos: Absorvente; Base antiderrapante; Base de cortiça; Adequado para máquina de lavar louça; Descartável; Ecológico; Resistente ao calor; Superfície antiaderente; Reutilizável; Reversível; Resistente a riscos; Empilhável; Impermeável; Outro
it: Caratteristiche dei sottobicchieri: Assorbente; Base antiscivolo; Retro in sughero; Sicuro per la lavastoviglie; Monouso; Ecologico; Resistente al calore; Superficie antiaderente; Riutilizzabile; Reversibile; Antigraffio; Impilabile; Impermeabile; Altro
hr-HR: Značajke podmetača: Upijajuće; Protuklizna baza; Plutena podloga; Može se prati u perilici posuđa; Za jednokratnu upotrebu; Ekološki prihvatljivo; Otporno na toplinu; Neljepljiva površina; Za višekratnu upotrebu; Upotrebljivo na obje strane; Otporno na ogrebotine; Može se slagati; Vodootporno; Ostalo
ru: Характеристики подставки под стакан: Впитывающая поверхность; Нескользящее основание; Пробковая подложка; Подходит для посудомоечной машины; Одноразовый; Экологичный; Термостойкий; Нелипкая поверхность; Многоразовый; Двусторонний; Устойчивость к царапинам; Компактное хранение стопкой; Водонепроницаемый; Другое
da: Bordskåners egenskaber: Absorberende; Skridsikker bund; Korkside; Tåler opvaskemaskine; Engangsbrug; Miljøvenlig; Varmeresistent; Non-stick overflade; Genanvendelig; Vendbar; Modstandsdygtig mod ridser; Stabelbar; Vandtæt; Andet
hu: Alátét jellemzői: Nedvszívó; Csúszásmentes alap; Parafa hátlap; Mosogatógépben mosható; Eldobható; Környezetbarát; Hőálló; Tapadásmentes felület; Újrafelhasználható; Kifordítható; Karcálló; Egymásra rakható; Vízálló; Egyéb
nb: Coaster-funksjoner: Absorberende; Antisklibase; Korkbakside; Tåler oppvaskmaskin; Engangsbruk; Miljøvennlig; Varmeresistent; Antiklebeoverflate; Gjenbrukbare; Reversibel; Ripebestandig; Kan stables; Vannsikker; Annet
fr: Caractéristiques des dessous de verre: Absorbant; Base antidérapante; Support en liège; Adapté au lave-vaisselle; Jetable; Respectueux de l’environnement; Résistant à la chaleur; Surface antiadhésive; Réutilisable; Réversible; Résistant aux rayures; Empilable; Imperméable; Autre
es: Características del posavasos: Absorbente; Base antideslizante; Respaldo de corcho; Apto para lavavajillas; Desechable; Producto ecológico; Resistente al calor; Superficie antiadherente; Reusable; Reversible; Resistente a arañazos; Apilable; Impermeable; Otros
bg-BG: Характеристики на подложките: Попиваемо; Основа против хлъзгане; Корков гръб; Може да се мие в съдомиялна машина; За еднократна употреба; Екологично; Термоустойчиво; Незалепваща повърхност; За многократна употреба; С две лица; Устойчиво на надраскване; Може да се слага едно върху друго; Водоустойчиво; Друго
sl-SI: Lastnosti podstavka: Vpijajoča; Protizdrsna podlaga; Plutovinasta podloga; Pralno v pomivalnem stroju; Za enkratno uporabo; Okolju prijazno; Odporno na vročino; Neoprijemljiva površina; Za večkratno uporabo; Reverzibilen; Odporno na praske; Zložljiva ena na drugo; Vodoodporen; Druga
el: Χαρακτηριστικά σουβέρ: Απορροφητικό; Αντιολισθητική βάση; Βάση από φελλό; Κατάλληλο για πλυντήριο πιάτων; Μίας χρήσης; Φιλικό προς το περιβάλλον; Ανθεκτικό στη θερμότητα; Αντικολλητική επιφάνεια; Επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμο; Διπλής όψης; Ανθεκτικό στις γρατσουνιές; Στοιβαζόμενο; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
pl: Charakterystyka podkładki: Chłonne; Antypoślizgowa podstawa; Z podkładem korkowym; Można myć w zmywarce; Do jednorazowego użytku; Ekologiczne; Odporne na wysokie temperatury; Powierzchnia nieprzywierająca; Wielokrotnego użytku; Dwustronne; Odporne na zarysowania; Sztaplowane; Wodoodporne; Pozostałe
en: Coaster features: Absorbent; Anti-slip base; Cork backing; Dishwasher safe; Disposable; Eco-friendly; Heat resistant; Non-stick surface; Reusable; Reversible; Scratch resistant; Stackable; Waterproof; Other
sv: Specifikationer för glasunderlägg: Absorberande; Halkfri yta; Korkbaksida; Diskmaskinsäker; För engångsbruk; Miljövänlig; Värmebeständig; Non-stick yta; Återanvändbar; Vändbar; Reptålig; Stapelbar; Vattensäker; Övrigt
sk-SK: Vlastnosti podložky: Absorpčný; Protišmyková základňa; Korkový podklad; Vhodné do umývačky riadu; Jednorazový; Ekologický; Teplovzdorný; Nepriľnavý povrch; Opakovane použiteľný; Obojstranný; Odolný voči poškriabaniu; Stohovateľný; Vodotesný; Iné
de: Untersetzereigenschaften: Saugfähig; Antirutschboden; Korkunterseite; Spülmaschinenfest; Einweg; Umweltfreundlich; Hitzebeständig; Antihaftbeschichtung; Wiederverwendbar; Umkehrbar; Kratzfest; Stapelbar; Wasserdicht; Sonstiges